Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.140

Unlawful possession of horse meat—Exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transport, to sell, offer to sell, or have on his or her premises horse meat for other than human consumption unless said horse meat is decharacterized in a manner prescribed by the director: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to carcasses slaughtered by a farmer for consumption on his or her own ranch or to carcasses in the possession of a person licensed under this chapter, or to canned horse meat meeting United States bureau of animal industry regulations.

[ 2011 c 336 s 444; 1949 c 100 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-18.]